Illinois, session 104th, HB3346.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by 5changing Section 7 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 10/7)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2217)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-594)8    Sec. 7. (a) The Department must prescribe and publish 9minimum standards for licensing that apply to the various 10types of facilities for child care defined in this Act and that 11are equally applicable to like institutions under the control 12of the Department and to foster family homes used by and under 13the direct supervision of the Department. The Department shall 14seek the advice and assistance of persons representative of 15the various types of child care facilities in establishing 16such standards. The standards prescribed and published under 17this Act take effect as provided in the Illinois 18Administrative Procedure Act, and are restricted to 19regulations pertaining to the following matters and to any 20rules and regulations required or permitted by any other 21Section of this Act:22        (1) The operation and conduct of the facility and 23    responsibility it assumes for child care;  HB3346- 2 -LRB104 08351 BAB 18402 b1        (2) The character, suitability and qualifications of 2    the applicant and other persons directly responsible for 3    the care and welfare of children served. All child day 4    care center licensees and employees who are required to 5    report child abuse or neglect under the Abused and 6    Neglected Child Reporting Act shall be required to attend 7    training on recognizing child abuse and neglect, as 8    prescribed by Department rules;9        (3) The general financial ability and competence of 10    the applicant to provide necessary care for children and 11    to maintain prescribed standards;12        (4) The number of individuals or staff required to 13    insure adequate supervision and care of the children 14    received. The standards shall provide that each child care 15    institution, maternity center, day care center, group 16    home, day care home, and group day care home shall have on 17    its premises during its hours of operation at least one 18    staff member certified in first aid, in the Heimlich 19    maneuver and in cardiopulmonary resuscitation by the 20    American Red Cross or other organization approved by rule 21    of the Department. Child welfare agencies shall not be 22    subject to such a staffing requirement. The Department may 23    offer, or arrange for the offering, on a periodic basis in 24    each community in this State in cooperation with the 25    American Red Cross, the American Heart Association or 26    other appropriate organization, voluntary programs to   HB3346- 3 -LRB104 08351 BAB 18402 b1    train operators of foster family homes and day care homes 2    in first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation;3        (5) The appropriateness, safety, cleanliness, and 4    general adequacy of the premises, including maintenance of 5    adequate fire prevention and health standards conforming 6    to State laws and municipal codes to provide for the 7    physical comfort, care, and well-being of children 8    received;9        (6) Provisions for food, clothing, educational 10    opportunities, program, equipment and individual supplies 11    to assure the healthy physical, mental, and spiritual 12    development of children served;13        (7) Provisions to safeguard the legal rights of 14    children served;15        (8) Maintenance of records pertaining to the 16    admission, progress, health, and discharge of children, 17    including, for day care centers and day care homes, 18    records indicating each child has been immunized as 19    required by State regulations. The Department shall 20    require proof that children enrolled in a facility have 21    been immunized against Haemophilus Influenzae B (HIB);22        (9) Filing of reports with the Department;23        (10) Discipline of children;24        (11) Protection and fostering of the particular 25    religious faith of the children served;26        (12) Provisions prohibiting firearms on day care   HB3346- 4 -LRB104 08351 BAB 18402 b1    center premises except in the possession of peace 2    officers;3        (13) Provisions prohibiting handguns on day care home 4    premises except in the possession of peace officers or 5    other adults who must possess a handgun as a condition of 6    employment and who reside on the premises of a day care 7    home;8        (14) Provisions requiring that any firearm permitted 9    on day care home premises, except handguns in the 10    possession of peace officers, shall be kept in a 11    disassembled state, without ammunition, in locked storage, 12    inaccessible to children and that ammunition permitted on 13    day care home premises shall be kept in locked storage 14    separate from that of disassembled firearms, inaccessible 15    to children;16        (15) Provisions requiring notification of parents or 17    guardians enrolling children at a day care home of the 18    presence in the day care home of any firearms and 19    ammunition and of the arrangements for the separate, 20    locked storage of such firearms and ammunition;21        (16) Provisions requiring all licensed child care 22    facility employees who care for newborns and infants to 23    complete training every 3 years on the nature of sudden 24    unexpected infant death (SUID), sudden infant death 25    syndrome (SIDS), and the safe sleep recommendations of the 26    American Academy of Pediatrics; and   HB3346- 5 -LRB104 08351 BAB 18402 b1        (17) With respect to foster family homes, provisions 2    requiring the Department to review quality of care 3    concerns and to consider those concerns in determining 4    whether a foster family home is qualified to care for 5    children. 6    By July 1, 2022, all licensed day care home providers, 7licensed group day care home providers, and licensed day care 8center directors and classroom staff shall participate in at 9least one training that includes the topics of early childhood 10social emotional learning, infant and early childhood mental 11health, early childhood trauma, or adverse childhood 12experiences. Current licensed providers, directors, and 13classroom staff shall complete training by July 1, 2022 and 14shall participate in training that includes the above topics 15at least once every 3 years. 16    (b) If, in a facility for general child care, there are 17children diagnosed as mentally ill or children diagnosed as 18having an intellectual or physical disability, who are 19determined to be in need of special mental treatment or of 20nursing care, or both mental treatment and nursing care, the 21Department shall seek the advice and recommendation of the 22Department of Human Services, the Department of Public Health, 23or both Departments regarding the residential treatment and 24nursing care provided by the institution.25    (c) The Department shall investigate any person applying 26to be licensed as a foster parent to determine whether there is   HB3346- 6 -LRB104 08351 BAB 18402 b1any evidence of current drug or alcohol abuse in the 2prospective foster family. The Department shall not license a 3person as a foster parent if drug or alcohol abuse has been 4identified in the foster family or if a reasonable suspicion 5of such abuse exists, except that the Department may grant a 6foster parent license to an applicant identified with an 7alcohol or drug problem if the applicant has successfully 8participated in an alcohol or drug treatment program, 9self-help group, or other suitable activities and if the 10Department determines that the foster family home can provide 11a safe, appropriate environment and meet the physical and 12emotional needs of children.13    (d) The Department, in applying standards prescribed and 14published, as herein provided, shall offer consultation 15through employed staff or other qualified persons to assist 16applicants and licensees in meeting and maintaining minimum 17requirements for a license and to help them otherwise to 18achieve programs of excellence related to the care of children 19served. Such consultation shall include providing information 20concerning education and training in early childhood 21development to providers of day care home services. The 22Department may provide or arrange for such education and 23training for those providers who request such assistance.24    (e) The Department shall distribute copies of licensing 25standards to all licensees and applicants for a license. Each 26licensee or holder of a permit shall distribute copies of the   HB3346- 7 -LRB104 08351 BAB 18402 b1appropriate licensing standards and any other information 2required by the Department to child care facilities under its 3supervision. Each licensee or holder of a permit shall 4maintain appropriate documentation of the distribution of the 5standards. Such documentation shall be part of the records of 6the facility and subject to inspection by authorized 7representatives of the Department.8    (f) The Department shall prepare summaries of day care 9licensing standards. Each licensee or holder of a permit for a 10day care facility shall distribute a copy of the appropriate 11summary and any other information required by the Department, 12to the legal guardian of each child cared for in that facility 13at the time when the child is enrolled or initially placed in 14the facility. The licensee or holder of a permit for a day care 15facility shall secure appropriate documentation of the 16distribution of the summary and brochure. Such documentation 17shall be a part of the records of the facility and subject to 18inspection by an authorized representative of the Department.19    (g) The Department shall distribute to each licensee and 20holder of a permit copies of the licensing or permit standards 21applicable to such person's facility. Each licensee or holder 22of a permit shall make available by posting at all times in a 23common or otherwise accessible area a complete and current set 24of licensing standards in order that all employees of the 25facility may have unrestricted access to such standards. All 26employees of the facility shall have reviewed the standards   HB3346- 8 -LRB104 08351 BAB 18402 b1and any subsequent changes. Each licensee or holder of a 2permit shall maintain appropriate documentation of the current 3review of licensing standards by all employees. Such records 4shall be part of the records of the facility and subject to 5inspection by authorized representatives of the Department.6    (h) Any standards involving physical examinations, 7immunization, or medical treatment shall include appropriate 8exemptions for children whose parents object thereto on the 9grounds that they conflict with the tenets and practices of a 10recognized church or religious organization, of which the 11parent is an adherent or member, and for children who should 12not be subjected to immunization for clinical reasons.13    (i) The Department, in cooperation with the Department of 14Public Health, shall work to increase immunization awareness 15and participation among parents of children enrolled in day 16care centers and day care homes by publishing on the 17Department's website information about the benefits of 18immunization against vaccine preventable diseases, including 19influenza and pertussis. The information for vaccine 20preventable diseases shall include the incidence and severity 21of the diseases, the availability of vaccines, and the 22importance of immunizing children and persons who frequently 23have close contact with children. The website content shall be 24reviewed annually in collaboration with the Department of 25Public Health to reflect the most current recommendations of 26the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices (ACIP). The   HB3346- 9 -LRB104 08351 BAB 18402 b1Department shall work with day care centers and day care homes 2licensed under this Act to ensure that the information is 3annually distributed to parents in August or September.4    (j) Any standard adopted by the Department that requires 5an applicant for a license to operate a day care home to 6include a copy of a high school diploma or equivalent 7certificate with the person's application shall be deemed to 8be satisfied if the applicant includes a copy of a high school 9diploma or equivalent certificate or a copy of a degree from an 10accredited institution of higher education or vocational 11institution or equivalent certificate.12    (k) As soon as practical after the effective date of this 13amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Department 14shall amend its rules establishing licensing standards for 15group day care homes to provide a revised maximum authorized 16extended capacity for group day care homes that is applicable 17through July 1, 2027. The revised maximum extended capacity 18rules adopted by the Department in its amended rules shall 19allow one caregiver and 2 assistants to have the option of 20caring for 2 additional children who are 30 months of age or 21older, as well as 2 additional children who are attending 22school full-time, notwithstanding any other provision of this 23Act. The revised rules shall also provide that the second 24assistant shall be present at all times when there are more 25than 12 children in the home and shall prohibit the total 26capacity of the group day care home from exceeding 16   HB3346- 10 -LRB104 08351 BAB 18402 b1children. 2(Source: P.A. 102-4, eff. 4-27-21; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23.) 3    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-594)4    Sec. 7. (a) The Department must prescribe and publish 5minimum standards for licensing that apply to the various 6types of facilities for child care defined in this Act (other 7than a day care center, day care home, or group day care home) 8and that are equally applicable to like institutions under the 9control of the Department and to foster family homes used by 10and under the direct supervision of the Department. The 11Department shall seek the advice and assistance of persons 12representative of the various types of child care facilities 13in establishing such standards. The standards prescribed and 14published under this Act take effect as provided in the 15Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, and are restricted to 16regulations pertaining to the following matters and to any 17rules and regulations required or permitted by any other 18Section of this Act:19        (1) The operation and conduct of the facility and 20    responsibility it assumes for child care;21        (2) The character, suitability and qualifications of 22    the applicant and other persons directly responsible for 23    the care and welfare of children served.;24        (3) The general financial ability and competence of 25    the applicant to provide necessary care for children and   HB3346- 11 -LRB104 08351 BAB 18402 b1    to maintain prescribed standards;2        (4) The number of individuals or staff required to 3    insure adequate supervision and care of the children 4    received. The standards shall provide that each child care 5    institution, maternity center, and group home shall have 6    on its premises during its hours of operation at least one 7    staff member certified in first aid, in the Heimlich 8    maneuver and in cardiopulmonary resuscitation by the 9    American Red Cross or other organization approved by rule 10    of the Department. Child welfare agencies shall not be 11    subject to such a staffing requirement. The Department may 12    offer, or arrange for the offering, on a periodic basis in 13    each community in this State in cooperation with the 14    American Red Cross, the American Heart Association or 15    other appropriate organization, voluntary programs to 16    train operators of foster family homes and day care homes 17    in first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation;18        (5) The appropriateness, safety, cleanliness, and 19    general adequacy of the premises, including maintenance of 20    adequate fire prevention and health standards conforming 21    to State laws and municipal codes to provide for the 22    physical comfort, care, and well-being of children 23    received;24        (6) Provisions for food, clothing, educational 25    opportunities, program, equipment and individual supplies 26    to assure the healthy physical, mental, and spiritual   HB3346- 12 -LRB104 08351 BAB 18402 b1    development of children served;2        (7) Provisions to safeguard the legal rights of 3    children served;4        (8) Maintenance of records pertaining to the 5    admission, progress, health, and discharge of children. 6    The Department shall require proof that children enrolled 7    in a facility (other than a day care center, day care home, 8    or group day care home) have been immunized against 9    Haemophilus Influenzae B (HIB);10        (9) Filing of reports with the Department;11        (10) Discipline of children;12        (11) Protection and fostering of the particular 13    religious faith of the children served;14        (12) (Blank);15        (13) (Blank);16        (14) (Blank);17        (15) (Blank);18        (16) Provisions requiring all licensed child care 19    facility employees who care for newborns and infants to 20    complete training every 3 years on the nature of sudden 21    unexpected infant death (SUID), sudden infant death 22    syndrome (SIDS), and the safe sleep recommendations of the 23    American Academy of Pediatrics (other than employees of a 24    day care center, day care home, or group day care home); 25    and 26        (17) With respect to foster family homes, provisions   HB3346- 13 -LRB104 08351 BAB 18402 b1    requiring the Department to review quality of care 2    concerns and to consider those concerns in determining 3    whether a foster family home is qualified to care for 4    children. 5    (b) If, in a facility for general child care (other than a 6day care center, day care home, or group day care home), there 7are children diagnosed as mentally ill or children diagnosed 8as having an intellectual or physical disability, who are 9determined to be in need of special mental treatment or of 10nursing care, or both mental treatment and nursing care, the 11Department shall seek the advice and recommendation of the 12Department of Human Services, the Department of Public Health, 13or both Departments regarding the residential treatment and 14nursing care provided by the institution.15    (c) The Department shall investigate any person applying 16to be licensed as a foster parent to determine whether there is 17any evidence of current drug or alcohol abuse in the 18prospective foster family. The Department shall not license a 19person as a foster parent if drug or alcohol abuse has been 20identified in the foster family or if a reasonable suspicion 21of such abuse exists, except that the Department may grant a 22foster parent license to an applicant identified with an 23alcohol or drug problem if the applicant has successfully 24participated in an alcohol or drug treatment program, 25self-help group, or other suitable activities and if the 26Department determines that the foster family home can provide   HB3346- 14 -LRB104 08351 BAB 18402 b1a safe, appropriate environment and meet the physical and 2emotional needs of children.3    (d) The Department, in applying standards prescribed and 4published, as herein provided, shall offer consultation 5through employed staff or other qualified persons to assist 6applicants and licensees (other than applicants and licensees 7of a day care center, day care home, or group day care home) in 8meeting and maintaining minimum requirements for a license and 9to help them otherwise to achieve programs of excellence 10related to the care of children served. Such consultation 11shall include providing information concerning education and 12training in early childhood development to providers of day 13care home services. The Department may provide or arrange for 14such education and training for those providers who request 15such assistance (other than providers at a day care center, 16day care home, or group day care home).17    (e) The Department shall distribute copies of licensing 18standards to all licensees and applicants for a license (other 19than licensees and applicants of a day care center, day care 20home, or group day care home). Each licensee or holder of a 21permit shall distribute copies of the appropriate licensing 22standards and any other information required by the Department 23to child care facilities under its supervision. Each licensee 24or holder of a permit shall maintain appropriate documentation 25of the distribution of the standards. Such documentation shall 26be part of the records of the facility and subject to   HB3346- 15 -LRB104 08351 BAB 18402 b1inspection by authorized representatives of the Department.2    (f) (Blank).3    (g) The Department shall distribute to each licensee and 4holder of a permit copies of the licensing or permit standards 5applicable to such person's facility (other than a day care 6center, day care home, or group day care home). Each licensee 7or holder of a permit shall make available by posting at all 8times in a common or otherwise accessible area a complete and 9current set of licensing standards in order that all employees 10of the facility may have unrestricted access to such 11standards. All employees of the facility shall have reviewed 12the standards and any subsequent changes. Each licensee or 13holder of a permit shall maintain appropriate documentation of 14the current review of licensing standards by all employees. 15Such records shall be part of the records of the facility and 16subject to inspection by authorized representatives of the 17Department.18    (h) Any standards (other than standards of a day care 19center, day care home, or group day care home) involving 20physical examinations, immunization, or medical treatment 21shall include appropriate exemptions for children whose 22parents object thereto on the grounds that they conflict with 23the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious 24organization, of which the parent is an adherent or member, 25and for children who should not be subjected to immunization 26for clinical reasons.  HB3346- 16 -LRB104 08351 BAB 18402 b1    (i) (Blank).2    (j) (Blank).3    (k) As soon as practical after the effective date of this 4amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Department 5shall amend its rules establishing licensing standards for 6group day care homes to provide a revised maximum authorized 7extended capacity for group day care homes that is applicable 8through July 1, 2027. The revised maximum extended capacity 9rules adopted by the Department in its amended rules shall 10allow one caregiver and 2 assistants to have the option of 11caring for 2 additional children who are 30 months of age or 12older, as well as 2 additional children who are attending 13school full-time, notwithstanding any other provision of this 14Act. The revised rules shall also provide that the second 15assistant shall be present at all times when there are more 16than 12 children in the home and shall prohibit the total 17capacity of the group day care home from exceeding 16 18children. 19(Source: P.A. 102-4, eff. 4-27-21; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 20103-594, eff. 7-1-26.) 21    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 22changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 23that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 24represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 25not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes   HB3346- 17 -LRB104 08351 BAB 18402 b1made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 2Public Act. 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.